District of Columbia statutes.
20-501

Conditions of appointment.

As a condition to appointment, a personal representative, whether in a supervised or unsupervised administration, shall file (a) a statement of acceptance of the duties of the office, (b) any required bond, and (c) a written consent to personal jurisdiction in any action brought in the District of Columbia against such personal representative, where service of process is effected pursuant to the rules of the Court at such representative’s address shown in the proceedings or, in the case of a nonresident personal representative, pursuant to the provisions of section 20-303(b)(7) .

History

June 24, 1980, D.C. Law 3-72, § 101, 27 DCR 2155
Mar. 21, 1995, D.C. Law 10-241, § 3(u), 42 DCR 63

Section References

This section is referenced in § 20-523.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 20-501.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of § 4 of D.C. Law 10-241, see § 2 of the Probate Reform Act of 1994 Emergency Amendment Act of 1995 (D.C. Act 11-79, June 28, 1995, 42 DCR 3452).

Editor's Notes

Application of Law 10-241:

10-241: Section 4 of D.C. Law 10-241, as amended by § 2 of D.C. Law 11-54, provided that the act shall be applicable to estates of decedents who died on or after July 1, 1995.